Utah statutes.
65A-2-3.   Endangered or threatened plant species -- Division authorized to
protect.
The division may make determinations concerning the management, protection,
and conservation of plant species officially designated as endangered or
threatened under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973, as amended, on
state lands.
